Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 19

Fertilizers, Liming Materials, and Soil Amendment

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

2-19-201. Penalty.

Any person selling or offering for sale any fertilizer or fertilizer material in violation of a provision of this subchapter, of a rule made under this subchapter, or of a notice issued under the authority of this subchapter shall be guilty of a violation.

Upon conviction, an offender shall be fined in any sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

Acts 1951, No. 106, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-714; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 11; 2019, No. 315, § 14.

2-19-202. Registration required for fertilizer brands and materials — Licensing required for fertilizer blending and storage facilities — Definition.

(1)All manufacturers, jobbers, and manipulators of commercial fertilizers and of fertilizer materials to be used in the manufacture of fertilizer, who may desire to sell or offer for sale in Arkansas fertilizer and fertilizer materials, shall first file for registration with the State Plant Board, upon forms furnished by the board. The forms shall include the name of the brand of each fertilizer, fertilizer materials, or chemicals which they may desire to sell in the state, either by themselves or their agents, together with the names and addresses of the manufacturers or manipulators, and such other information as may be required by the board in its rules.

A registrant shall not be required to register each grade of fertilizer that is formulated but shall report the mixed formulations on a monthly basis as required by §2-19-209.

All registrations must be approved by the board or its authorized agent before being effective.

Registrations may be cancelled by the board for repeated flagrant violations of this subchapter, after notice and a hearing.

(A)Each commercial fertilizer registrant shall report the guaranteed analysis by net weight of each registered fertilizer brand and the name and address of the registrant.

Except for specialty fertilizers as defined in subdivision (d)(2) of this section, no guaranteed analysis of complete fertilizer shall be allowed indicating fractional units of primary plant food.

Raw materials may be registered under a guarantee of the actual plant food content.

In the case of bone meal, the phosphoric acid content shall be stated as a total, and its actual nitrogen content shall be stated.

In the case of rock phosphate, both the total and available phosphoric acid content shall be stated.

(1)All manufacturers, jobbers, blenders, and manipulators of commercial fertilizers and of fertilizer materials to be used in the manufacture of fertilizer, who may desire to sell or offer for sale in Arkansas fertilizer or fertilizer materials, shall first obtain a facility license from the board for each fertilizer blending or bulk storage facility which they operate.

After notice and hearing, the board shall, by rules, promulgate the standards and criteria which it determines are necessary to license fertilizer blending or bulk storage facilities.

(1)(A)The board may, under its rules, set and collect reasonable fertilizer brand registration and facility licensing fees.

The fees shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund of the State Treasury.

All registrations shall expire on June 30 of each year.

Any commercial fertilizer sold must contain a minimum of twenty (20) units of primary plant food, except for the following exemptions for special agricultural crop fertilizer formulations and for specialty fertilizers:

History.

Acts 1951, No. 106, § 1; 1957, No. 356, § 1; 1981, No. 398, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-701; Acts 1991, No. 189, § 1; 1993, No. 352, § 1; 1993, No. 373, § 1; 2019, No. 378, § 3.

2-19-203. Sale of unregistered fertilizer.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 106, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-708; Acts 1991, No. 189, § 2.

2-19-204. Exempted transactions.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to restrict or prohibit sales of superphosphates or any other fertilizer materials to one another by importers, manufacturers, or manipulators who mix materials for sale, or prevent the free and unrestricted shipments of materials to manufacturers who have registered their brands, as required by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 106, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-712.

2-19-205. Statement required on each container.

Before selling or offering for sale in this state complete fertilizer or fertilizer materials, all persons, companies, manufacturers, dealers, or agents shall brand, print, or attach to each bag or other container:

A true statement giving the name and address of the manufacturer or guarantor;

The net weight of the package or other container, in pounds;

The brand name or trademark;

The guaranteed analysis: nitrogen%, phosphoric acid, available%, potash soluble in distilled water%; and

Such other information as the State Plant Board may require in its rules.

This information shall be given in the invoice rather than on the container for sales of anhydrous ammonia and other fertilizers in bulk.

All the provisions of this subchapter which apply to statements or guarantees appearing on containers shall apply equally to information contained in the invoice.

In an action on a promissory note given for the purchase of a commercial fertilizer for an agreed price, it was a good defense that the sale of the fertilizer was made in this state and that the fertilizer had never been analyzed by the Commissioner of Mines, Manufactures, and Agriculture (now State Plant Board) nor tags affixed to the bags as required by the law. Florence Cotton Oil Co. v. Anglin, 105 Ark. 672, 152 S.W. 295 (1912) (decision under prior law).

In action on notes taken in payment for fertilizer, the seller was entitled to recover if the jury found that the fertilizer contained the ingredients named in the percent stated on the tags attached to the sacks or if there was no greater deficiency than three percent. Warren Cotton Oil & Mfg. Co. v. Gorman, 123 Ark. 279, 185 S.W. 433 (1916) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1951, No. 106, § 2; 1953, No. 221, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-702.

2-19-206. Penalty for deficiency from guaranteed analysis.

(1)If any commercial fertilizer or fertilizer material offered for sale in this state shall, upon official analysis, prove deficient from its guarantee as stated on the bag or other container, to the extent of three percent (3%) and not over five percent (5%), then the manufacturer of the commercial fertilizer or fertilizer materials or his or her agent shall be liable for the actual deficiency as shown by the official analysis.

If the deficiency is over five percent (5%), then the penalty will be three (3) times the amount of the total deficiency as found by the official analysis.

The penalty shall apply only to the shipment sampled.

In its rules, the State Plant Board may set up penalties for any guaranteed constituents found deficient beyond a reasonable tolerance.

(1)Penalties assessed under this section and under such rules as may be enacted under it, except those exceeding the actual value of the shortages found, shall be paid to the consumer of the lot of deficient fertilizer within thirty (30) days after the date of notice from the board to the manufacturer or agent, receipts to be taken and promptly forwarded to the board.

The value of the deficiencies, if any, exceeding the actual shortages, and the actual value of the shortages when the consumer cannot be found, shall be paid to the board within forty-five (45) days after the date of notice from the board to the manufacturer or his or her agent and shall be deposited into the Feed and Fertilizer Fund of the State Treasury.

(1)The board shall ascertain the market value of the materials from the manufacturers of fertilizer and fertilizer materials specified in this subchapter to be used in the manufacture of fertilizer and fertilizer materials and from other reliable sources. This determination shall be done to fix units of value on them to be used in determining the amount of damages due when the official analysis shows a deficiency from the guaranteed analysis as specified in this subchapter.

The board is authorized to cancel the present registration or refuse to register for the next season any fertilizer or fertilizer materials offered for sale by any manufacturer, jobber, or manipulator who fails or refuses to comply with this section.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 106, § 3; 1957, No. 356, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-703.

2-19-207. Sampling fertilizers.

The inspectors for the State Plant Board shall obtain samples of fertilizer or fertilizer materials in the following manner:

They shall draw samples with a core instrument that shall not be less than twelve inches (12") in length in a manner that will procure a representative sample from such shipments of fertilizer or fertilizer materials as they may be directed by the board or that they may find uninspected;

Where there are ten (10) packages or less, they shall take samples from every package; where there are ten (10) or more packages, they shall take samples from ten (10) packages, plus a sample for each additional ton. In no case do more than twenty (20) packages need to be sampled;

After thoroughly mixing the samples so drawn, they shall fill a container to be approved by the board with a portion of the mixed sample for chemical analysis or inspection; and

Accompanying these samples, a report shall be made giving the name of the commodity inspected, number of packages represented by sample, the name of the manufacturer, the guaranteed analysis, the place where inspected, the date of inspection, and the name of the inspector.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 106, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-709.

2-19-208. Analysis of fertilizers.

Samples of fertilizer or fertilizer materials obtained by the inspectors shall be delivered to the State Plant Board which shall deliver the samples to the chief department chemist who shall make or cause to be made a complete analysis thereof.

Analyses are to be made according to methods adopted by the AOAC International.

He or she shall file his or her analysis with the board, and it shall be recorded as official.

The official analysis of fertilizer or fertilizer materials under the seal of the board shall be deemed prima facie evidence in any court of this state on the trial of any issue involved on the merits of the fertilizer or fertilizer materials represented by the sample.

Three (3) copies of the official analysis shall be made:

One (1) shall be sent:

To the manufacturer;

To the purchaser; and

One (1) kept on file in the office of the board.

Ark. L. Rev.

Documentary Evidence — Arkansas, 15 Ark. L. Rev. 79.

(1)(A)All manufacturers and manipulators or agents representing them who have registered their brands in compliance with § 2-19-202 shall forward to the State Plant Board each month a report that shall reach its office on or before the twentieth day of the month, on the forms and in the number of copies to be prescribed by the State Plant Board.

The report shall include a sworn statement of the total tonnage of all commercial fertilizers and fertilizer materials shipped or caused to be shipped for sale or consumption in this state, or which have been made, mixed, manufactured, or compounded in this state for sale or consumption in this state.

(A)(i)The report shall be accompanied with the sum of two dollars and forty cents ($2.40) per ton or fractional ton.

A fee of two dollars and forty cents ($2.40) will accompany each monthly report of tonnage which amounts to less than one (1) ton.

The State Plant Board shall issue receipt for the amount received and shall deposit the sums received as follows:

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in (a), substituted “two dollars and forty cents ($2.40)” for “one dollar and twenty cents ($1.20)” in (a)(2)(A)(i) and (ii), substituted “Sixty-two cents (62¢) of the two dollars and forty cent ($2.40)” for “Thirty-one cents (32¢) of the one dollar and twenty cent ($1.20)” in (a)(2)(B)(i), substituted “One dollar and seventy-eight cents ($1.78) of the two dollar and forty cent ($2.40)” for “Eighty-nine cents (89¢) of the one dollar and twenty cent ($1.20)” in (a)(2)(A)(ii)(a) , inserted “Division of Agriculture” in (a)(2)(A)(ii)(a) and twice in (a)(2)(A)(ii)(b)(1) , and made related changes.

Sixty-two cents (62¢) of the two-dollar-and-forty-cent fee per ton or fractional ton inspected shall be deposited with the Treasurer of State as special revenues and shall be credited to the Plant Board Fund to be used for the maintenance, operation, support, and improvement of the board; and

(a)One dollar and seventy-eight cents ($1.78) of the two-dollar-and-forty-cent fee per ton or fractional ton inspected shall be remitted to the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas and shall be credited to a fund to be known as the “University of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and Research Fund” to be maintained in accounts in one (1) or more financial institutions in the State of Arkansas. This amount shall be expended exclusively for soil testing service and soil fertility research by the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas under appropriations made by the General Assembly. It shall be expended in support of one (1) or more soil testing laboratories and soil fertility research activities at the main experiment station, branch experiment stations, or subbranch experiment stations, as determined and designated by the Vice President for Agriculture of the University of Arkansas.

(1)The Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas shall provide for the investment of any funds in the University of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and Research Fund that are not needed for current operations of the soil testing laboratories and soil fertility service and research activities and shall credit the interest earned on that investment to the credit of the University of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and Research Fund.

(1)The State Plant Board or its agents shall have the right, at any time, to inspect or audit the books of any manufacturer and manipulator or their agents to determine the correctness of the monthly reports required under this section.

The State Plant Board shall have authority to establish rules in regard to the enforcement of this subchapter and in regard to inspection, analysis, and sale of fertilizer or fertilizer materials that shall not be inconsistent with the provisions of this subchapter.

The board or its authorized representatives shall have authority to stop the sale of any fertilizer or fertilizer material when the sale is found in violation of this subchapter, or of the rules of the board made in accordance with this subchapter, or when it has reason to suspect that the sale is in violation of this subchapter or of the board's rules.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 106, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-710.

2-19-209. Monthly tonnage reports.

The investment shall be of the type and nature authorized for the investment of average daily State Treasury balances by the State Board of Finance.

Refusal to allow this inspection or audit shall be deemed a violation of this subchapter, and the violator shall be subject to the penalties provided in this subchapter.

For a late report or for failure to report the entire amount sold, the tonnage fee on the late reported or unreported amount shall be enhanced by ten percent (10%) if less than fifteen (15) days late, twenty percent (20%) if less than thirty-one (31) days late, and doubled if more than thirty (30) days late. Penalties shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund; otherwise, registrations may be cancelled by the State Plant Board.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 106, § 4; 1953, No. 301, § 1; 1957, No. 356, § 3; 1981, No. 398, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-707; Acts 1993, No. 783, § 1; 1999, No. 766, § 1; 2009, No. 326, § 1.

2-19-210. Rules.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 106, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-711.

2-19-211. Use of penalties from fertilizer tonnage fees.

All penalties received by the State Plant Board for failure to pay or report fertilizer tonnage fees shall be remitted to the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas, to be credited to the University of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and Research Fund in the same manner as prescribed by §2-19-209 and to be used for the same purposes as described in §2-19-209.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 989, § 1; 2009, No. 326, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this subchapter” in §§2-19-201 —2-19-210 may not apply to this section, which was enacted subsequently.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “Division of Agriculture” and made a related change.

2-19-212. Local legislation preemption — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Local legislation” means any ordinance, motion, resolution, amendment, regulation, or rule adopted by a political subdivision of this state; and

“Political subdivision” means any local governmental entity including without limitation, any city, county, township, or municipal corporation and any other body corporate and politic that is responsible for government activities in a geographical area smaller than that of the state.

No political subdivision shall:

Regulate the registration, packaging, labeling, sale, storage, distribution, use, or application of fertilizers; or

Adopt or continue in effect local legislation relating to the registration, packaging, labeling, sale, storage, distribution, use, or application of fertilizers.

Local legislation in violation of this section is void and unenforceable.

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 353, § 11: July 1, 1969.

Acts 1983, No. 724, § 4: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the soils testing research and extension programs and services of the University of Arkansas have made substantial contributions to the agricultural and livestock industries in this state through information derived through research and extension that has led to improved uses of lime and improved formulation and application of lime in crop and plant production; that the existing soil testing services and funds available for soil testing research and extension are not adequate to meet the agricultural and livestock needs of this state, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to enable the State Plant Board to collect sufficient fees from the inspection of lime to provide the funds for the efficient and necessary operation of the plant board and soil testing research and extension services of the University of Arkansas, to provide the funds essential for the operation of existing programs and continued progress in the use of lime in crop and plant production in this state, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to enable the plant board to collect said fees for the purposes set forth in this act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1993, No. 783, § 13: Mar. 29, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly meeting in Regular Session that the provisions of this act are of critical importance to the state's ability to continue the duties, responsibilities, and functions of the State Plant Board. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Acts 2007, No. 678, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Liming Materials

2-19-301. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Arkansas Agricultural Liming Materials Act”.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 353, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1901.

2-19-302. Penalty.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this subchapter or any rule adopted under this subchapter shall upon conviction be guilty of a violation and fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense and not less than three hundred dollars ($300) for every subsequent offense.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 353, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1908; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 12; 2019, No. 315, § 15.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted “guilty of a violation and”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation”.

2-19-303. Labeling requirements — Definition.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “liming material” means all or any form of limestone, lime rock, dolomite, marl, slag, by-product lime, brown lime, industry or factory refuse lime, and any other material moved, prepared, sold, or distributed primarily for correcting soil acidity.

Every lot, package, or parcel of liming material sold or offered or exposed for sale or distribution within this state shall have on each bag, package, or other container in a conspicuous place on the outside; or in the case of bulk lime, there shall accompany each load and the vendor shall present to the purchaser a legible and true statement in the English language giving:

The net weight of the contents of the package, bag, other container, or bulk load;

The true name of the product;

The name and principal address of the manufacturer, importer, or other guarantor;

The minimum neutralizing value in terms of percent of calcium carbonate equivalent;

The degree of fineness expressed as:

Minimum percentage passing through a ten (10) mesh sieve;

Minimum percentage passing through a sixty (60) mesh sieve; and

Minimum percentage passing through a one hundred (100) mesh sieve; and

Any other statements that the State Plant Board in its rules may require.

In lieu of subdivisions (b)(4) and (5) of this section, the board may in its rules set minimum standards of calcium carbonate equivalence and fineness for various grades of liming materials. These grades when stated shall become the minimum guarantees of the liming material so labeled.

Before any liming material is sold or offered for sale or distribution in this state, the manufacturer, importer, or other guarantor, which is a person or firm who places or mixes liming materials of more than one (1) manufacturer in a stockpile, shall register each such liming material with the State Plant Board.

The registration shall contain the statement referred to in § 2-19-303 or the rules provided for therein and be accompanied by a fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for each liming material.

Registrations shall expire June 30 of each year.

The report shall include a sworn statement of the total tonnage of all liming materials distributed in this state and shall be accompanied by the sum of thirty cents (30¢) per ton or fractional ton.

A fee of thirty cents (30¢) will accompany each quarterly report of tonnage which amounts to less than one (1) ton.

(A)When sales or distributions of liming materials are between registrants, the registrant who sells or distributes to a person or firm who is not a registrant shall be responsible for payment of the inspection fee unless the payment is made by the registrant initiating the transaction.

Invoices of transactions between registrants shall be marked “inspection fee paid” or “inspection fee not paid”; otherwise, the registrant initiating the transaction shall be responsible for the inspection fee.

The State Plant Board shall issue receipts for the amounts received and shall deposit the sums received as follows:

Twenty cents (20¢) of the thirty-cent fee per ton or fractional ton inspected shall be deposited with the Treasurer of State as special revenues. It shall be credited to the State Plant Board to be used for its maintenance, operation, support, and improvement; and

(a)Ten cents (10¢) of the thirty-cent fee per ton or fractional ton inspected shall be remitted to the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas. This amount shall be credited to a fund to be known as the “University of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and Research Fund” to be maintained in accounts in one (1) or more financial institutions in the State of Arkansas. This amount shall be expended exclusively for soil testing service and soil fertility research and extension by the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas under appropriations made by the General Assembly. It shall be expended in support of one (1) or more soil testing laboratories and soil fertility research activities at the main experiment stations, branch experiment stations, or subbranch experiment stations, as determined and designated by the Vice President for Agriculture of the University of Arkansas.

(1)The Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas shall provide for the investment of any funds in the University of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and Research Fund that are not needed for current operations of the soil testing laboratories and soil fertility service and research and extension activities and shall credit the interest earned on the investment to the credit of the University of Arkansas, Division of Agriculture, Soil Testing and Research Fund.

(1)The State Plant Board or its agents shall have the right at any time to inspect or audit the books of any manufacturer and manipulator or their agents to determine the correctness of the monthly reports required under this section.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “Division of Agriculture” in (a)(3)(C)(ii)(a) and twice in (b)(1), and made related changes.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 353, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1902.

2-19-304. Sampling and analysis.

The State Plant Board through its authorized agents is authorized to select from any package, bulk load, or lot of liming material exposed for sale or distribution in this state a quantity not less than two pounds (2 lbs.) for a sample, to be used for the purpose of an official analysis for comparison with the statement required by §2-19-303 or the rules provided for therein.

The board and its authorized agents shall have free access during reasonable business hours to all premises where liming materials are manufactured, sold, or stored, and vehicles wherein distributed, and are authorized at all times to stop-sale by written order any and all liming materials that are unregistered, misbranded, fail to meet the guarantee, or otherwise fail to comply with the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 353, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1905.

2-19-305. Penalty for deficiency from guaranteed analysis.

If any liming material offered for sale in this state shall, upon official analysis, prove deficient from its statement of guarantee to the extent of five percent (5%) or more, then the manufacturer, importer, or guarantor of the liming material shall be liable for two (2) times the value of the actual deficiency as shown by the official analysis.

(1)Penalties assessed under this section, except those exceeding the actual value of the shortages found, shall be paid to the consumer of the lot of deficient liming material within thirty (30) days after the date of notice from the State Plant Board to the manufacturer, importer, or guarantor, receipts to be taken and promptly forwarded to the board.

The value of the deficiencies exceeding the actual shortages and the actual value of the shortages when the consumer cannot be found shall be paid to the board within forty-five (45) days after the date of notice from the board to the manufacturer, importer, or guarantor and shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund of the State Treasury.

The board is authorized to cancel the present registration or to refuse to register for the next season any liming materials offered for sale or distribution by any manufacturer, importer, or guarantor who fails or refuses to comply with this section.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 353, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1906.

2-19-306. Registration and vendor's license.

(a)

Registration.

(b)

Vendor's License.

It shall be unlawful for any person or firm to engage in the spreading of liming material on properties belonging to others unless application for a license shall be in the form prescribed by the board. The form shall state the name and address of the applicant and total number of spreader trucks or other similar vehicles to be used by the applicant.

The application shall be accompanied by a fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for the license plus a fee of three dollars ($3.00) for each spreader truck or similar vehicle.

Licenses shall expire June 30 of each year.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 353, § 3; 1983, No. 724, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1903.

2-19-307. Quarterly tonnage reports.

(1)(A)(i)All manufacturers, importers, and other guarantors who are registered under §2-19-306(a) shall forward to the State Plant Board each quarter a report on forms prescribed by the State Plant Board, not later than thirty (30) days after the end of each quarter.

Quarters shall end September 30, December 31, March 31, and June 30 of each year.

The investment shall be of the type and nature authorized for the investment of average daily State Treasury balances by the State Board of Finance.

Refusal to allow this inspection or audit shall be deemed a violation of this subchapter, and the violator shall be subject to the penalties provided in it.

For a late report or for failure to report the entire amount sold, the tonnage fee on the late report or unreported amount shall be doubled, and penalties shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund; otherwise, registrations may be cancelled by the State Plant Board.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 353, § 4; 1983, No. 724, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1904; Acts 1993, No. 783, § 2; 2009, No. 326, § 3.

2-19-308. Rules.

The State Plant Board is empowered to enforce the provisions of this subchapter and to prescribe and enforce such rules relating to the sale or distribution of liming materials as may be deemed necessary to carry into effect the full intent and meaning of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 353, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1907.

Subchapter 4

— Soil Amendment

Effective Dates. Acts 1977, No. 377, § 15: Mar. 8, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of Arkansas that the introduction of certain substances into the soil of this state endangers the soil of Arkansas, and poses a severe threat to the health, safety and welfare of the people of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

2-19-401. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Soil Amendment Act of 1977”.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2101.

2-19-402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Active ingredient” means the ingredient or ingredients which are claimed to have beneficial effects on soil or crops growing on soils;

“Adulterated” means and shall apply to any soil amendment if:

It contains any deleterious or harmful agent in sufficient amount to render it injurious to beneficial plants, animals, or aquatic life when applied in accordance with the directions for use shown on the label; or if adequate warning statements and directions for use which may be necessary to protect plants, animals, or aquatic life are not shown on the label;

Its composition falls below that which it is purported to possess by its labeling; or

It contains noxious weed seed, harmful insects, or harmful disease organisms;

“Board” means the State Plant Board;

“Bulk” means in nonpackaged form;

“Distribute” means to import, consign, offer for sale, sell, barter, or to otherwise supply soil amendments to any person in this state;

“Distributor” means any person who imports, consigns, sells, offers for sale, barters, or otherwise supplies soil amendments in this state;

“Inert ingredient” means the ingredients which do not have any beneficial or harmful effects on soil or crops but are present in the product;

“Label” means the display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate container of a soil amendment;

“Labeling” means all written, printed, or graphic matter upon or accompanying any soil amendment and all advertisements, brochures, posters, or television or radio announcements used in promoting the sale of a soil amendment;

“Manufacturer” means any person who produces, compounds, mixes, or blends soil amendments;

“Misbranded” means and shall apply if:

Any soil amendment bears a label that is false or misleading in any particular;

Any soil amendment is distributed under the name of another soil amendment;

Any material is represented as a soil amendment or is represented as containing a soil amendment, unless the soil amendment conforms to the definition of identity, if any, prescribed by rule;

The percentage of active ingredient in any soil amendment is not shown in the approved ingredient form; or

The labeling on any soil amendment is false or misleading in any particular;

“Name” means the specific designation under which the individual product is offered for sale;

“Percent” or “percentage” means by weight;

“Person” means individuals, partnerships, associations, and corporations;

“Registrant” means any person who registers a soil amendment under the provisions of this subchapter; and

“Soil amendment” means and includes any substance which is intended to improve the physical, chemical, or other characteristics of the soil or improve crop production, except the following:

Commercial fertilizers, unless represented to contain as an active ingredient a substance other than a recognized plant food element or represented as promoting plant growth by other than supplying a recognized plant food element;

Agricultural liming materials;

Agricultural gypsum;

Unmanipulated animal manures;

Topsoil;

Unmanipulated vegetable manures;

Pesticides; and

Herbicides.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (11)(C).

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2103; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 16.

2-19-403. Penalty.

Any person convicted of violation of any provision of this subchapter or the rules promulgated under this subchapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2112.

2-19-404. Administration.

This subchapter shall be administered by the State Plant Board.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2102.

2-19-405. Inspection authorized.

The authorized agents of the State Plant Board may inspect, sample, analyze, and test soil amendments distributed in this state at any time and place and to such extent as may be deemed necessary to determine whether soil amendments are in compliance with this subchapter.

The board and its employees or agents are authorized to enter upon public or private property during regular working hours in order to have access to soil amendments for the purpose of administering this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2109.

2-19-406. Rules.

The State Plant Board is authorized to adopt such rules as may be necessary to administer this subchapter, including methods of sampling, methods of analysis, and designation of ingredient forms, and to promulgate definitions of identity of products.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2110.

2-19-407. Labeling requirements and approval of ingredients.

Each container of a soil amendment shall be labeled on the face or display side in a readable and conspicuous form to show the following information:

The net weight of the contents;

The name of the product;

The guaranteed analysis, including the name and the percentage of each active ingredient and the percentage of inert ingredients;

A statement as to the purpose of the product;

Adequate directions for use such as application rates, cultural practices, and plants to be benefited; and

The name and address of the registrant.

Bulk lots shall be labeled by attaching a copy of the label to the invoice which shall be furnished the purchaser.

The State Plant Board may require proof of claims made for any soil amendment.

If no claims are made, the board may require proof of usefulness and value of the soil amendment.

For evidence of proof, the board will rely on experimental data, evaluations, or advice supplied from such sources as the University of Arkansas Agricultural Experiment Station and the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service.

All experimental results shall be related to Arkansas conditions for which the product is intended.

The board may accept or reject other sources of proof as additional evidence in evaluating soil amendments.

No soil-amending ingredient may be listed or guaranteed on the labels or labeling of soil amendments without board approval.

The board may allow a soil-amending ingredient to be listed or guaranteed on the label or labeling if satisfactory supportive data is provided the board to substantiate the value and usefulness of the soil-amending ingredient.

When a soil-amending ingredient is permitted to be listed or guaranteed, it must be determinable by laboratory methods and is subject to inspection and analysis.

The board may prescribe methods and procedures of inspection and analysis of the soil-amending ingredient.

The board may stipulate, by rule, the quantities of the soil-amending ingredients required in soil amendments.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (d)(3).

The board, after a public hearing, may change the inspection fee schedule.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2104; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 17.

2-19-408. Registration of products.

(1)Each soil amendment product shall be registered with the board before it is distributed in this state.

Application for registration shall be submitted to the State Plant Board on a form prepared for that purpose showing the information required on the label, as provided in §2-19-407, except net weight of product.

The registration fee shall be set by the board for each product.

All registrations shall expire on June 30 of the year for which the soil amendment product is registered.

With the application for registration, the applicant shall submit a copy of the label and a copy of all advertisements, brochures, posters, and television and radio announcements to be used in promoting the sale of the soil amendment.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2105.

2-19-409. Denial or revocation of registration.

The State Plant Board shall refuse to register any product that does not comply with this subchapter and the rules promulgated under it.

(1)The board is also authorized and empowered to revoke any registration upon satisfactory evidence that the registrant or any of his or her agents has used fraudulent or deceptive practices.

Registration shall not be revoked until the registrant has been given an opportunity for hearing before the board or its duly authorized agent.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 377, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2111.